Montana, session 2025, LC2274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Archer with impaired mobility permit -- definitions. (1) The
department shall issue an archer with impaired mobility permit to a person who has permanent impaired
mobility and is nonambulatory as defined in this section.
(2) The permit entitles the holder to:
(a) hunt game animals as defined in 87-2-101 during established archery seasons;
(b) use modified archery tackle that supports the bow and draws, holds, and releases the string;
and
(c) use a crossbow that:
(i) has a minimum draw weight of 125 pounds;
(ii) is equipped with iron sights or a scope with no more than 1 power magnification; and
(iii) uses bolts that weigh no less than 500 grains each with fixed blade broadheads that weigh no
less than 100 grains each.
(3) A permitholder must have a companion to assist in immediately dressing any killed game
animal. The companion may also assist the permitholder by hunting a game animal that has been wounded by
the permitholder when the permitholder is unable to pursue and kill the wounded game animal.
(4) The department shall adopt rules to establish the qualifications that a person must meet to be a
companion and may adopt rules to establish when a companion can be a designated shooter for a
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2274.1
permitholder.
(5) To qualify for an archer with impaired mobility permit, a person shall present proof of the
following:
(a) evidence that the person has passed a course or courses in the state that provide hunter
education pursuant to 87-2-105, including the safe handling of bow hunting tackle and firearms; and
(b) certification by a licensed physician or an advanced practice registered nurse that the person
has permanent impaired mobility and is nonambulatory.
(6) Certification under subsection (5)(b) must be on a form provided by the department.
(7) The department or a person who disagrees with a determination of disability or eligibility for an
archer with impaired mobility permit may request a review by the board of medical examiners pursuant to 37-3-
203.
(8) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Advanced practice registered nurse" means a registered professional nurse who has
completed educational requirements related to the nurse's specific practice role as specified by the board of
nursing pursuant to 37-8-202 in addition to completing basic nursing education.
(b) "Nonambulatory" means permanently, physically reliant on a wheelchair or a similar
compensatory appliance or device for mobility.
(c) "Physician" means a person who holds a degree as a doctor of medicine or a doctor of
osteopathy and who has a valid license to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine in this state.

Section 2. Section 37-3-203, MCA, is amended to read:
"37-3-203. Powers and duties -- rulemaking authority. (1) The board may:
(a) adopt rules necessary or proper to carry out the requirements in this chapter and of chapters
covering podiatry, physician assistants, nutritionists, and emergency care providers as set forth in Title 37,
chapters 6, 20, and 25, and 50-6-203, respectively. Rules adopted for emergency care providers with an
endorsement to provide community-integrated health care must address the scope of practice, competency
requirements, and educational requirements.
(b) hold hearings and take evidence in matters relating to the exercise and performance of the
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2274.1
powers and duties vested in the board;
(c) aid the county attorneys of this state in the enforcement of parts 1 through 4 and 8 of this
chapter as well as Title 37, chapters 6, 20, and 25, and Title 50, chapter 6, regarding emergency care providers
licensed by the board. The board also may assist the county attorneys of this state in the prosecution of
persons, firms, associations, or corporations charged with violations of the provisions listed in this subsection
(1)(c).
(d) review certifications of disability and determinations of eligibility for a permit to hunt from a
vehicle as provided in 87-2-803(11) and an archer with impaired mobility permit as provided in [section 1]; and
(e) fund additional staff, hired by the department, to administer the provisions of this chapter, by
increasing license fees as necessary.
(2) (a) The board shall establish a medical assistance program to assist and rehabilitate licensees
who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board and who are found to be physically or mentally impaired by
habitual intemperance or the excessive use of addictive drugs, alcohol, or any other drug or substance or by
mental illness or chronic physical illness.
(b) The board shall ensure that a licensee who is required or volunteers to participate in the
medical assistance program as a condition of continued licensure or reinstatement of licensure must be allowed
to enroll in a qualified medical assistance program within this state and may not require a licensee to enroll in a
qualified treatment program outside the state unless the board finds that there is no qualified treatment program
in this state.
(3) (a) The board shall report annually on the number and types of complaints it has received
involving physician practices in providing written certification, as defined in 16-12-502, for the use of marijuana
for a debilitating medical condition provided for in Title 16, chapter 12, part 5. The report must contain:
(i) the number of complaints received by the board pursuant to 37-1-308;
(ii) the number of complaints for which a reasonable cause determination was made pursuant to
37-1-307;
(iii) the general nature of the complaints;
(iv) the number of investigations conducted into physician practices in providing written
certification; and
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2274.1
(v) the number of physicians disciplined by the board for their practices in providing written
certification for the use of marijuana for a debilitating medical condition.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (3)(c), the report may not contain individual identifying
information regarding the physicians about whom the board received complaints.
(c) For each physician against whom the board takes disciplinary action related to the physician's
practices in providing written certification for the use of marijuana for a debilitating medical condition, the report
must include:
(i) the name of the physician;
(ii) the general results of the investigation of the physician's practices; and
(iii) the disciplinary action taken against the physician.
(d) The board shall provide the report to the economic affairs interim committee in accordance with
5-11-210 and shall make a copy of the report available on the board's website.
(4) The board may enter into agreements with other states for the purposes of mutual recognition
of licensing standards and licensing of physicians and emergency care providers from other states under the
terms of a mutual recognition agreement."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 87, chapter 2, part 8, and the provisions of Title 87, chapter 2, part 8, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective March 1, 2026.
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – ****